Colorado, session 2026A, HB1146.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 24-51-101, amend
(20); and add (5.5) as follows:
24-51-101. Definitions.
As used in this article 51, unless the context otherwise requires and
except as otherwise defined in part 17 of this article 51:
(5.5) "APPROVED FACILITY SCHOOL" HAS THE SAME MEANING AS SET
FORTH IN SECTION 22-2-402 (1).
________
Capital letters or bold & italic numbers indicate new material added to existing law; dashes
through words or numbers indicate deletions from existing law and such material is not part of
the act.

(20) "Employer" means the state of Colorado, the general assembly,
any state department, board, commission, bureau, agency, or institution, the
Colorado association of school boards, the Colorado high school activities
association, the Colorado association of school executives, the fire and
police pension association, the special districts association, the Colorado
water resources and power development authority, the public employees'
retirement association, the Colorado consortium for earth and space science
education, all school districts in Colorado, and any political subdivision,
city, municipality, county, housing authority, special district, library district,
regional planning commission, public hospital, county or district public
health agency, state university, state college, state local district college,
APPROVED FACILITY SCHOOL, or other public entity that is affiliated with the
plan.
SECTION 2. In Colorado Revised Statutes, amend 24-51-309 as
follows:
24-51-309. Affiliation by public entities.
Except as otherwise provided in section 24-51-320, any political
subdivision within the state of Colorado, or any public agency created by
the state or any of its political subdivisions, OR ANY APPROVED FACILITY
SCHOOL, may make application APPLY to the board to affiliate with the
association. Any such entity specified in this section that previously
exempted its employees from membership in the association may, by
ordinance or resolution, apply to the board to be affiliated with the
association. All applications shall be subject to approval by the board, and
upon approval the benefits, duties, and responsibilities of employers and
members shall begin from the date of affiliation with the association. The
Denver public schools division shall include charter schools that participate
in the DPS plan prior to January 1, 2010, and any future charter schools that
are approved by the Denver public schools board of education and that enter
into a charter contract with the Denver public schools board of education
on or after January 1, 2010. The board shall not allow affiliation into the
Denver public schools division of any employer not approved by the Denver
public schools board of education. ANY APPROVED FACILITY SCHOOL THAT
AFFILIATES WITH THE ASSOCIATION PURSUANT TO THIS SECTION MUST BE
ASSIGNED TO THE LOCAL GOVERNMENT DIVISION.
SECTION 3. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 24-51-313, amend (1)
PAGE 2-HOUSE BILL 26-1146

as follows:
24-51-313. Termination of affiliation - employer assigned to
local government division - requirements.
(1) Any political subdivision within the state of Colorado or any
public agency created by such a political subdivision, OR ANY APPROVED
FACILITY SCHOOL, that is an employer affiliated with the association
pursuant to section 24-51-309 and that is assigned to the local government
division may make application to the board to terminate the affiliation of the
employer with the association. The application shall be made by submitting
to the board an ordinance or resolution that has been adopted by the
governing body of the employer and that has been approved by at least
sixty-five percent of the employees of the employer who are members. Such
employee members of the employer shall be notified in writing of the
provisions of section 24-51-321 prior to a vote on an ordinance or
resolution to terminate the affiliation of the employer with the association.
Notwithstanding the provisions of this subsection (1), any such employer
that ceases operations or ceases to participate in the association for any
reason shall be deemed to have terminated its affiliation with the association
and must comply with the provisions of sections 24-51-315 to 24-51-319.
SECTION 4. Act subject to petition - effective date. This act
takes effect at 12:01 a.m. on the day following the expiration of the
ninety-day period after final adjournment of the general assembly (August
12, 2026, if adjournment sine die is on May 13, 2026); except that, if a
referendum petition is filed pursuant to section 1 (3) of article V of the state
constitution against this act or an item, section, or part of this act within
such period, then the act, item, section, or part will not take effect unless
PAGE 3-HOUSE BILL 26-1146

approved by the people at the general election to be held in November 2026
and, in such case, will take effect on the date of the official declaration of
the vote thereon by the governor.
____________________________ ____________________________
Julie McCluskie James Rashad Coleman, Sr.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE PRESIDENT OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
____________________________ ____________________________
Vanessa Reilly Esther van Mourik
CHIEF CLERK OF THE HOUSE SECRETARY OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
APPROVED________________________________________
(Date and Time)
_________________________________________
Jared S. Polis
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF COLORADO
PAGE 4-HOUSE BILL 26-1146